Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 3. Schools of Barbering and Instructors

§§ 33-7-301 through 33-7-314.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 42, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This article, which derived from Laws 1961, ch. 196, §§ 1 through 14, related to barbering schools and instructors.

Laws 2005, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.